Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6353.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 5 of the General Laws entitled "BUSINESSES AND PROFESSIONS"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 37.9
THE PRIMARY CARE PRESERVATION ACT
5-37.9-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "The Primary Care Preservation Act".
5-37.9-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings
unless the context shall clearly indicate another or different meaning or intent:
(1) "Payor" means an insurer, health maintenance organization, or other entity responsible
for payment of healthcare services under a health plan.
(2) "Physician practice" means a medical practice owned or operated by licensed
physicians providing outpatient care in the State of Rhode Island.
(3) "Practice support contribution" means a fee charged by a physician practice to patients
for operational services including, but not limited to, reception, referral coordination, medication
refill management, medical assistant support, and general operational overhead.
5-37.9-3. Authorization of practice support contributions.
(a) A physician practice may charge a practice support contribution not to exceed one

hundred twenty dollars ($120) per year, per patient, enrolled in a healthcare insurance plan,
excluding Medicaid and traditional Medicare.
(b) The practice support contribution shall be adjusted annually based on the most recently
published annual consumer price index, as formulated and computed by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
5-37.9-4. Payor non-interference.
(a) No payor shall include in any contract with a physician practice a clause that prohibits
or restricts the practice from charging, billing, or collecting a practice support contribution directly
from patients.
(b) Payors shall not bill or collect the practice support contribution on behalf of a physician
practice.
5-37.9-5. Patient access and care continuity.
(a) Physician practices may require current payment of the practice support contribution as
a condition for scheduling non-emergent appointments for patients enrolled in healthcare insurance
or Medicare Advantage plans.
(b) Patients in arrears shall receive standard and customary care, including medication
refills for thirty (30) days and medical record transfers upon request.
5-37.9-6. Reimbursement of contributions.
The practice support contribution may be eligible for reimbursement by the state or a payor;
provided that, such reimbursement is processed separately from the physician practice’s direct
billing to patients.
5-37.9-7. Severability.
If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this chapter shall be adjudged by any
court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, that judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate
the remainder of the chapter but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph,
section, or part directly involved in the controversy in which that judgment shall have been
rendered.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002909
========
LC002909 - Page 2 of 3